Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1575.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:(1) Article XVII-B.(2) Article XVII-D.(3) Article XVII-E.(4) Article XVII-G.(5) Article XVII-H.(6) Article XVII-I.(7) Article XVII-J.(8) Article XVII-K.(8.1) Article XVII-L.(8.2) Article XVII-M.(9) Article XVIII.(10) Article XVIII-B.(11) Article XVIII-D.(12) Article XVIII-E.(13) Article XVIII-F.(14) Article XVIII-G.(14.1) Article XVIII-H.(15) Article XIX-A.(15.1) Article XIX-C.(16) Article XIX-E.(16.1) Article XIX-F.(17) Section 2010.(19) Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(20) The act of December 1, 2004 (P.L.1750, No.226), known as the First Class Cities Economic Development District Act.(21) 12 Pa.C.S. Ch. 34 (relating to Infrastructure and 20250HB1575PN1873 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facilities Improvement Program).(22) Any other program established by a law of this Commonwealth in which a person applies for and receives a credit against a tax. This paragraph shall not apply to a credit against a tax liability as a result of an overpayment.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MFACTORY OR MILL BUILDINGECONOMIC REVITALIZATIONSection 1701-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Building." A factory or mill complex that: (1) was constructed prior to January 1, 1973; (2) has at least one floor, excluding a basement; (3) has been, is or will be used primarily for manufacturing, processing, wholesale trade and other commercial purposes and may be adaptively reused for residential, commercial, cultural, institutional or industrial uses or any combination thereof;(4) is proposed for substantial rehabilitation; (5) has been at a minimum 75% vacant for a minimum of 24 months at the time of submission of a request under section 1702-M by the municipality in which the factory or mill complex is located;(6) is designated by the municipality for consideration as a program-eligible building as provided in this article; and20250HB1575PN1873 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) meets any other requirement established by the department."Building owner." An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity which is the owner of record of a program-eligible building and may include one or more successors in title to the owner of the building at the time the building received written notice of final designation as a program-eligible building in accordance with section 1703-M. The term includes the owner of a leasehold interest with a minimum term of 30 years, with respect to which a memorandum of lease has been recorded in the office of the recorder of deeds of the county."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Factory or mill complex." One or more factory or mill buildings, located on the same or contiguous parcels of land, each of which, at one time, had the same owner or owners."Program-eligible building." A building with respect to which the department has issued a written notice of final designation as a program-eligible building in accordance with section 1703-M."Qualified tax liability." Tax liability imposed on a taxpayer under Article III, IV, VII, VIII, IX, XI or XV, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III."Rehabilitation and reconstruction costs." As follows:(1) Amounts incurred and paid by a building owner, after issuance of the notice of final designation of the building as a program-eligible building, which are solely and exclusively for the rehabilitation of the program-eligible building. The term includes amounts incurred and paid to 20250HB1575PN1873 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquire tangible personal property and structural components of the program-eligible building which:(i) are depreciated under 26 U.S.C. § 167 (relating to depreciation);(ii) have a useful life of at least three years as evidenced by the tax depreciation method taken and shown on the Federal tax return of the building owner; and(iii) are acquired by purchase as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 179(d) (relating to election to expense certain depreciable business assets).(2) The term does not include amounts incurred or paid with respect to tangible personal property and structural components of a program-eligible building which the building owner leases from any other person or corporation. For purposes of this paragraph, a contract or agreement to lease or rent or for a license to use property shall be considered a lease unless the contract or agreement is treated for Federal income tax purposes of the building owner as an installment purchase rather than a lease."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Substantial rehabilitation." Rehabilitation and reconstruction costs of a program-eligible building that are: (1) incurred during the time period for project completion specified by the building owner on the building owner's application for a tax credit certificate and approved by the department under section 1704-M; and(2) in a dollar amount that equals or exceeds 20% of the appraised market value of the program-eligible building prior to reconstruction or rehabilitation, which are determined by 20250HB1575PN1873 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a Commonwealth licensed and certified appraiser who is independent of the building owner or owners and their affiliated corporations and any tenants of the program-eligible building and their affiliated corporations. For purposes of determining whether a program-eligible building has been substantially rehabilitated, the market value of the program-eligible building shall be determined at the beginning of the day on which the department issued notice of final designation of the program-eligible building."Tax credit." A tax credit issued under this article."Taxpayer." A person subject to tax under Article III, IV, VII, VIII, IX, XI or XV. The term includes a pass-through entity.Section 1702-M. Building designation process.(a) Request by municipality.--Beginning 18 months after the effective date of this section, a municipality may submit to the department a list of buildings located within the municipality that the municipality requests the department to consider for designation as program-eligible buildings. The request must include a statement by the municipality attesting that, within six months of preliminary designation of one or more of the listed buildings as program-eligible buildings, the municipality agrees to:(1) expedite the building permit review process required in the municipality for the rehabilitation of the program-eligible buildings;(2) provide design standards in the municipality which encourage historic preservation of the program-eligible buildings and that conform to rehabilitation design standards developed and recommended by the Pennsylvania Historical and 20250HB1575PN1873 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Museum Commission and the United States Secretary of the Interior's Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties; and(3) require the review and approval by the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission be obtained for the rehabilitation of any program-eligible building in the municipality.(b) Preliminary designation.--Within 60 days of receipt of a request from a municipality under subsection (a), the department shall notify the municipality in writing as to which buildings have been approved for preliminary designation as program-eligible buildings.(c) Treatment as separate building.--A portion of a building may be treated as a separate building for purposes of this article if:(1) it consists of a clearly identifiable part of a building, including, without limitation, one or more wings, stories or other separable portions of the building;(2) it is held by a single owner in fee or as a condominium, cooperative or leasehold interest; and(3) at least one business reasonably could be operated within the confines of the portion of the building.Section 1703-M. Notice of final designation of program-eligible building.Upon compliance with section 1702-M(a), the department shall provide to the municipality and to the building owner a written notice of final designation as a program-eligible building for each building that received preliminary designation under section 1702-M(b). The notice of final designation shall include a statement that an independent appraisal is required in order 20250HB1575PN1873 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to document substantial rehabilitation.Section 1704-M. Tax credit for substantial rehabilitation. (a) General rule.--A taxpayer that is a building owner may apply to the department for a tax credit certificate against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability.(b) Eligible costs.-- (1) Upon approval of the taxpayer's application by the department, the taxpayer may claim a tax credit for the rehabilitation and reconstruction costs of a program-eligible building which has been substantially rehabilitated.(2) Once substantial rehabilitation is established by the taxpayer, the taxpayer may claim a tax credit for all rehabilitation and reconstruction costs incurred with respect to the program-eligible building within five years from the date of final designation of the program-eligible building under section 1703-M.(c) Amount.-- (1) A taxpayer may receive a tax credit of up to 25% of the rehabilitation and reconstruction costs of the program-eligible building up to a maximum of $1,500,000.(2) The tax credit shall be allowable in the year the substantially rehabilitated program-eligible building is first placed into service, which is the earlier of:(i) the year in which, under the taxpayer's depreciation practice, depreciation begins with respect to the property; or(ii) the year in which the property is placed in a condition or state of readiness and availability for its specifically assigned function.(d) Carry forward.--Amounts of unused tax credit may be 20250HB1575PN1873 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 carried over and offset against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability for a period not to exceed the following seven taxable years.Section 1705-M. (Reserved).Section 1706-M. (Reserved). Section 1707-M. Revocation of eligibility. The department may revoke the designation of a building as a program-eligible building under section 1703-M for noncompliance with this article.Section 1708-M. Tax credit certificates. (a) Application.--(1) A taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit certificate under section 1704-M. The application shall be on a form established by the department.(2) The application shall specify a time period during which the rehabilitation and reconstruction occurred with respect to the program-eligible building.(b) Issuance of certificate.--(1) The department shall review an application received under section 1704-M and shall determine whether the application meets the requirements established under this article and any related guidelines or regulations.(2) If the department determines that an application meets the requirements, the department shall issue a tax credit certificate in the amount specified under section 1704-M.(3) Tax credit certificate applications shall be approved on a first-come, first-served basis.(c) Carry back, refund, sale and assignment of tax credit.--A taxpayer may not carry back, obtain a refund of, sell or 20250HB1575PN1873 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assign an unused tax credit granted under this article.(d) Limitation.--(1) The total aggregate amount of tax credits approved under this article shall not exceed $15,000,000 in a fiscal year.(2) In granting tax credit certificates under this article, the department may not grant more than $15,000,000 in tax credit certificates in any fiscal year exclusive of any tax credit certificates not awarded or returned from previous fiscal years.Section 1709-M. Claiming the tax credit.Upon presentation by a taxpayer of a tax credit certificate to the Department of Revenue, the taxpayer may claim a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer.Section 1710-M. Penalties. (a) Failure to maintain operations.--A building owner that receives a tax credit and fails to substantially maintain existing operations in the program-eligible building for which the tax credit is claimed for a period of five years from the date the tax credit is first allowable shall refund to the Commonwealth the total amount of tax credit granted.(b) Waiver.--The department may waive the penalty in subsection (a) if the department determines that the failure to substantially maintain existing operations in the program-eligible building occurred because of circumstances beyond the building owner's control, including a natural disaster, unforeseen industry trend or a loss of a major supplier or market.Section 1711-M. Program administration. The department shall establish guidelines as may be necessary 20250HB1575PN1873 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to administer this article, and shall post the guidelines on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The guidelines shall include parameters for what constitutes substantially maintaining existing operations of a program-eligible building.Section 1712-M. Report to General Assembly. (a) Report.--(1) No later than June 30, 2026, and September 1 of each year thereafter, the secretary shall submit a report to the General Assembly containing the following:(i) A summary of the effectiveness of the tax credit provided by this article.(ii) The names of all taxpayers utilizing the tax credit under this article as of the date of the report.(iii) The amount of tax credit approved for and utilized by each taxpayer.(iv) Any recommendation for changes in the calculation or administration of the tax credit.(2) The report shall be submitted to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Public information.--Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the information in the report shall be public information, and all report information shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible internet website.20250HB1575PN1873 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The addition of Article XVII-M of the act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1575PN1873 - 12 - 123